Hawaii, session 2026, SB1118.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that noise pollution is a serious problem affecting mental health and quality of life, particularly in urban areas.  Internal combustion engine mopeds are significant contributors to noise pollution, often having higher noise levels than motorcycles with larger displacement and robust exhaust baffles. The legislature further finds that electric mopeds are much cheaper to operate and maintain than internal combustion engine mopeds.  Additionally, the broad deployment of charging infrastructure is not an impediment to the adoption of electric mopeds because electric moped batteries can be easily removed and charged inside a residence or workplace. The legislature also finds that numerous jurisdictions including in Asia, Europe, and Africa have already required the transition from internal combustion engine mopeds to electric mopeds. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to require any business established after January 1, 2026, that uses, rents, or offers for rent mopeds in the course of their commercial business, to use electric mopeds. SECTION 2. Chapter 286, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§286-    Sale of certain combustion engine-powered mopeds prohibited; penalties.  (a) Beginning January 1, 2026, no newly established business shall use, rent, or offer for rent any combustion engine-powered moped. (b) This section shall not be construed to prohibit any business from reselling, renting, or offering for resale or rent a combustion engine‑powered moped if the business was established before January 1, 2026. (c) Any business who violates this section shall be fined not more than $1,000 for each separate offense.  Each moped used, rented, or offered for rent in violation of this section shall constitute a separate offense. (d)  For the purposes of this section, "business" means a person or entity that engages in the business of delivering goods or services via moped or rents or offers for rent mopeds to consumers." SECTION 3. New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4. This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________